Oklahoma, session 2025, SB415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1289.24e, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 1289.24e. A. The State Legislature hereby occupies and

preempts the entire field of legislation by any agency of this state

or any political subdivision in this state to infringe upon the

rights of a citizen of the State of Oklahoma this state, the

unalienable right to keep and bear arms as guaranteed to them by the

Second Amendment of the United States Constitution.

B. Any federal, state, county, or municipal act, law, executive

order, administrative order, court order, rule, policy, or

regulation ordering that offers or orders the buy-back,

confiscation, or surrender of firearms, firearm accessories, or

Req. No. 996 Page 1

ammu nition from law-abiding citizens of this state shall be

considered an infringement on the rights of citizens to keep and

bear arms as guaranteed by the Second Amendment of the Constitution

of the United States and Article II, Section 26 of the Constitution

of Oklahoma United States Constitution and Section 26 of Article II

of the Oklahoma Constitution.

C. It shall be the duty of the courts and law enforcement

agencies of this state to protect the rights of law-abiding citizens

to keep and to bear arms within the borders of this state and to

protect these rights from the infringement provided under the

provisions of this act the Second Amendment Sanctuary State Act.

D. The preemption provided in this act the Second Amendment

Sanctuary State Act shall include:

1. Any regulation of arms and ammunition, pursuant to the

National Firearms Act of 1934, prohibited or regulated on or after

the effective date of this act April 26, 2021; and

2. Any regulations regulation or provision of the Gun Control

Act of 1968, prohibited or regulated on or after the effective date

of this act April 26, 2021.

E. For purposes of this section:

1. “Arms” is defined as means any firearm, firearm part,

accessory, or ammunition required to render that firearm operable

and effective;



Req. No. 996 Page 2

2. “Infringement” shall mean means any law that reduces,

represses, diminishes, or subverts the right to keep and bear arms,

ammunition, parts, and accessories in any amount that is legal as of

the effective date of this act April 26, 2021, of any citizen in

this state; and

3. “Law-abiding citizen” means a person who is not otherwise

precluded under state law from possessing a firearm and shall not be

construed to include anyone who is not legally present in the United

States or this state.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



60-1-996 CN 1/14/2025 3:51:11 PM

























Req. No. 996 Page 3